Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 34.11.11 of Title 62, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services (OMES)
shall create a reporting function within the state's accounting
software to assess whether a contract is service-driven or for staff
augmentation.
B. OMES shall amend the state accounting manual to require that
any invoice for intangible assets include a file path to a permanent
file location where the asset will be maintained during post-review.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3414 Page 2